District of Columbia statutes.
31-3932.15

Rulemaking.

The Commissioner may promulgate rules necessary to effectuate the purposes of this subchapter. Rules promulgated pursuant to this section shall not affect an SPFC insurance securitization in effect at the time of the promulgation.

Mar. 17, 2005, D.C. Law 15-262, § 215
as added Mar. 14, 2007, D.C. Law 16-285, § 2(b), 54 DCR 944